Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3445
Council on public improvements and
services; membership; powers and duties.

A council on public
improvements and services may be created within each county or for adjoining
counties by resolutions of county boards or by joint resolutions passed by
at least three different types of political subdivisions located in the county
which are authorized to levy property taxes or which may benefit from property
taxes affected by the levy limits imposed by sections 77-3442 to 77-3444.
Such councils shall include, but are not limited to, one elected official
from each school board, county board, incorporated city or village, natural
resources district, community college, educational service unit, hospital
district, airport authority, fire protection district, and township taxing
property within the county or counties. The elected governing body of each
political subdivision which has the legal authority to request property tax
funding or a levy set by the county board within a county may by resolution
of the governing body appoint one elected official from the governing board
to the council on public improvements and services.

Councils on public improvements and services may meet as often as necessary prior
to the adoption of budgets and property tax requests affected by the levy
limits described in sections 77-3442 to 77-3444. The council shall jointly
examine the budgets and property tax requests of each governmental agency
or quasi-governmental agency with statutory authority to request a share of
the property tax. The county clerk of each county shall attend such meetings
and keep a public record of the proceedings. Each council on public improvements
and services which is created by resolution as provided in this section shall
hold at least one public meeting prior to the adoption of public budgets affected
by the levy limits imposed by sections 77-3442 to 77-3444. Such council may
continue to meet to discuss issues of public service provision in an effective
and coordinated manner, the impacts of levy limits, state and federal law,
program, or aid changes, and the joint provision or use of capital facilities
and equipment.

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 306, § 39;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 100.